California statutes. Financial Code
(a) Any credit union that extends consumer credit to a covered borrower, as those terms are defined in Part 232 (commencing with Section 232.1) of Subchapter M of Chapter I of Subtitle A of Title 32 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as published on July 22, 2015, on page 43560 in Number 140 of Volume 80 of the Federal Register, shall comply with the applicable provisions of Section 987 of Title 10 of the United States Code, as amended by 126 Stat. 1785 (Public Law 112-239), and Part 232 (commencing with Section 232.1) of Subchapter M of Chapter I of Subtitle A of Title 32 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as
 amended on the date described above.

(b) A credit union that does not market or extend
 consumer credit to covered borrowers, as those terms are defined under Part 232 (commencing with Section 232.1) of Subchapter M of Chapter I of Subtitle A of Title 32 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as amended on the date described in subdivision (a), shall not be in violation of Section 394 of the Military and Veterans Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 514, Sec. 2.   (SB 266)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

14961.

Any licensee that violates any provision of any of the following federal acts or regulations violates this division:(a) The federal Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act, as amended (12 U.S.C. Sec. 2601 et seq.).

(b) The federal Truth in Lending Act, as amended (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 et seq.).

(c) The federal Home Ownership Equity Protection Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1639).

(d) Any
 regulation promulgated under any of the federal acts in subdivision (a), (b), or (c).

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 629, Sec. 5.   (AB 260)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Maximum Charges and Fees [15001. - 15001.]

15001.

Every credit union may assess charges as approved by the board of directors for failure to meet punctually obligations to the credit union. Any late charge shall be made only once for each delinquent payment and shall be subject to Section 2954.5 of the Civil Code, Division 1.1 (commencing with Section 4000) of this code, and any other applicable law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 539, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Loans to Directors, Officers and Committee Members [15050. - 15051.]

15050.

(a) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Credit manager” means any individual, regardless of title, designated pursuant to Section 14600 to fulfill the duties of a credit manager.

(2) “Obligation” means any loan or approved line of credit, including both used and unused portions, on which the official is a borrower, coborrower, cosigner, endorser, or guarantor.

(3) “Officer” means an officer, as described in Section 14500, that is employed by the credit union.

(4) “Official” means a director, member of the supervisory committee, member of the audit committee, or member of the
 credit committee of a credit union.

(b) A credit union shall not enter into any obligation with any official, directly or indirectly, unless all of the following apply:

(1) The obligation complies with all lawful requirements of this division with respect to obligations permitted for other members of the credit union.

(2) The obligation is not on terms more favorable than those extended to other members of the credit union.

(3) The obligation is entered into in accordance with a written policy adopted by the directors establishing that all officials shall have an equal opportunity to enter into obligations with the credit union.

(c) A credit union shall not enter into any obligation with
 any official, directly or indirectly, unless all of the following requirements are satisfied:

(1) Upon the making of the obligation, the aggregate amount of obligations outstanding to all officials, except obligations fully secured by shares, shall not exceed 20 percent of the aggregate dollar amount of all savings capital, as defined in Section 14400, of the credit union.

(2) The obligation, except any portion of an obligation fully secured by shares, shall not exceed the maximum obligation to the credit union set forth in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 15100.

(3) Any obligation that would cause the aggregate amount of obligations outstanding to the official to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), excluding any portion fully secured by shares, shall be approved by the credit committee or the credit manager,
 and by the board of directors. An official shall not take part in any credit decision, directly or indirectly, for the official’s benefit and shall not be present during any portion of any committee or board meeting where the official’s credit application is under consideration.

(4) The names of members of the credit committee, the credit manager, and board of directors who voted to authorize or ratify the obligation shall be entered in their respective minutes.

(d) A credit union shall not permit an official to become surety for any obligation created by the credit union for anyone other than a member of the official’s immediate family.

(e) A credit union shall not enter into any obligation with any credit manager or any officer employed by the credit union unless the obligation is in compliance with all
 requirements of this division with respect to obligations permitted for other nonemployee members, and not on terms more favorable than those extended to other employees, and approved by the board of directors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 305, Sec. 9.   (AB 2062)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

15051.

The board of directors shall declare the office of any director, officer, committee member, or the credit manager vacant if the person fails to reduce any obligation to the credit union for which he or she is liable in a timely manner according to the terms of the obligation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 789, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Limitations [15100. - 15103.]

15100.

(a) The board of directors shall establish written policies which shall set forth the policies of the credit union with respect to any obligation that is offered to the members of the credit union. The written policies shall set forth the maximum amounts and terms for any obligation offered to the members, including, but not limited to, the following information:

(1) For loans, the written policies shall set out the terms for unsecured loans, the maximum amount and terms for secured loans, the schedule of interest rates established pursuant to Section 15000 for each type or class of unsecured and secured loan offered to members, the maximum maturity for any loan, or, in the case of an open-end loan, the rate of repayment for any type or class of open-end loan, the
 limitations, if any, which shall be placed on the authority of any loan officer appointed pursuant to Sections 14602 and 14603, and, subject to the provisions of subdivisions (b) and (c), the individual limits on obligations that are applicable to all members of the credit union. Any policy developed pursuant to this section by the board of directors shall, insofar as possible, and, subject to individual creditworthiness, ensure equal access to funds available for obligations with credit union members.

(2) For obligations other than those set out in paragraph (1), the board of directors shall set out the interest rates and essential terms of the obligations offered to the members and any other information as may be required pursuant to regulations that may be adopted by the commissioner.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), no credit union policy shall permit a credit union to
 enter into obligations with an individual credit union member whereby the total obligations of that member, exclusive of amounts secured by shares or certificates for funds, exceed 10 percent of the aggregate dollar amount of the credit union’s savings capital, as defined in Section 14400.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), no credit union policy shall permit a credit union to enter into obligations with any one family whereby the total obligations of the family would be greater than the amount permitted by subdivision (b). For purposes of this article, “family” means the marital couple or any head of household together with those dependents residing with the marital couple or the head of household and those dependents attending school away from the principal residence of the marital couple or head of household.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 305, Sec. 10.   (AB 2062)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

15101.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 15100, if a loan is made for educational purposes and such loan would cause the aggregate of loans to an individual or to any one family to exceed the limitations imposed by subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 15100, such educational loan shall not be included in computing the aggregate of loans pursuant to Section 15100, provided (1) that such educational loan is secured in accordance with subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 14955, and (2) that the aggregate amount of such educational loan exempted by this subdivision from subdivision (c) of Section 15100 shall not exceed ten thousand dollars
 ($10,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 209, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

15102.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 726 of the Code of Civil Procedure or any other provision of law to the contrary, a credit union, an affiliate of a credit union, a credit union service organization, or any successor in interest thereto, that originates, acquires, or purchases, in whole or in part, any loan secured directly or collaterally, in whole or in part, by a mortgage or deed of trust on real property, or any interest therein, may bring an action for recovery of damages, including exemplary damages not to exceed 50 percent of the actual damages, against a borrower where the action is based on fraud under Section 1572 of the Civil
 Code and the fraudulent conduct by the borrower induced the original lender to make that loan.

(b) The provisions of this section shall not apply to loans secured by single-family, owner-occupied residential real property, when the property is actually occupied by the borrower as represented to the lender in order to obtain the loan and the loan is for an amount of one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) or less, as adjusted annually, commencing on January 1, 1987, to the Consumer Price Index as published by the United States Department of Labor.

(c) Any action maintained under this section for damages shall not constitute a money judgment for deficiency or a deficiency judgment within the meaning of Section 580a, 580b, or 580d of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 173, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

15103.

A credit union, or the agent of a credit union, that has received a notice pursuant to Section 7507.6 of the Business and Professions Code, shall not make a subsequent assignment to skip trace, locate, or repossess a vehicle without simultaneously, and in the same manner by which the assignment is given, advising the assignee of the assignment of the information contained in the notice. As used in this section, “assignment” has the same meaning set forth in Section 7500.1 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 192, Sec. 7.   Effective September 7, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Merger, Dissolution and Conversion [15200. - 15359.]



  ARTICLE 1. Merger [15200. - 15204.]

15200.

Any credit union may, with the approval of the commissioner, merge with another credit union or with a central credit union.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 452, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

15201.

(a) The merger shall be made pursuant to any plan agreed upon by the majority of the board of directors of each credit union joining in the merger, and approved by the affirmative vote of at least a majority of the members of the disappearing credit union, in person or by proxy, at a meeting of the members called for that purpose or by written consent of a majority of the members of the disappearing credit union. Notice of the meeting shall be given to the members, either personally or by first-class mail, not less than 30 nor more than
 90 days prior to the date of the meeting.

(b) The commissioner may approve a merger according to the plan agreed upon by the majority of the board of directors of each credit union, as set forth in subdivision (a), if the plan of merger is approved by less than a majority of the membership as provided in subdivision (a) if the commissioner finds, upon the written and verified application filed by the board of directors, that (1) notice of the meeting called to consider the merger or the ballot for written vote on the merger was mailed to each member entitled to vote upon the question, (2) the notice or ballot disclosed the purpose of the meeting or the written vote, (3) the notice or ballot informed the membership that approval of the merger might be sought pursuant to this section, and (4) a majority of the votes cast upon the question were in favor of the merger.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), the commissioner may approve a merger without a vote of the membership of the disappearing credit union if a majority of the members of the board of directors of the surviving credit union approves the merger, the disappearing credit union is in danger of insolvency and the merger would reduce the risk or avoid a threatened loss to the National Credit Union Share Insurance Fund or other form of share guaranty or insurance that is acceptable to the commissioner. For purposes of this chapter, a credit union is insolvent when, from the most recent available financial statements, it can be shown that the total amount of its shares exceeds the present cash value of its assets after providing for liabilities unless the commissioner finds all of the following:

(1) The facts that caused the deficient share-asset ratio no longer exist.

(2) Further decline in the share-asset ratio is not probable.

(3) The return of the share-asset ratio to its normal limits within a reasonable time for the credit union concerned is probable.

(4) The probability of a further potential loss is negligible to the National Credit Union Share Insurance Fund or other form of share guaranty or insurance that is acceptable to the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 539, Sec. 41.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15202.

(a) After the requirement of approval as provided in Section 15201 is satisfied, each credit union shall execute a certificate of merger as an officers’ certificate pursuant to Section 5062 of the Corporations Code that shall set forth:

(1) That the plan of merger has been approved by the board of directors.

(2) That the plan of merger has been duly approved by any required vote of the members pursuant to
 Section 15201.

(3) The total number of members of the credit union.

(b) A copy of the plan of merger and of the written approval thereof by the commissioner shall be annexed to the certificate of merger. 

(c) Nothing in this section requires a federal credit union to execute or file the certificate of merger called for in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 539, Sec. 41.3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15203.

Each certificate of merger called for in Section 15202 shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State. After the filing in the office of the Secretary of State, a copy of each certificate of merger, certified by the Secretary of State, shall be filed with the commissioner, and at that time the merger shall become effective for all purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 539, Sec. 42.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15204.

(a) Upon any merger effectuated as provided in this article, all property, property rights, and interests of the merged credit union shall vest in the surviving credit union, without deed, endorsement or other instruments of transfer, and all debts, obligations and liabilities of the merged credit union are assumed by the surviving credit union under whose charter the merger has been effected. Thereafter the charter of the merged credit union is void, and the existence of the merged credit union as a legal entity separate from the
 surviving credit union terminates.

(b) Whenever a credit union having any real property in this state merges with another credit union and vests that real property in the surviving credit union, the filing for record in the office of the county recorder of any county in this state in which any of the real property of the disappearing credit union is located of the certificates of merger and requisite attachments, as required by Section 15202, shall evidence record ownership in the surviving credit union of all interest of the disappearing credit union in and to the real property located in that county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 187, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Dissolution [15250. - 15260.]

15250.

(a) Whenever the board of directors of a credit union recommends by a vote of a majority of all its members the dissolution of the credit union, the members of the credit union, at any meeting specially called to consider the subject, may elect to dissolve the credit union, by the vote or written consent of a majority of all members of the credit union.

(b) The commissioner may approve the dissolution of a credit union which is recommended by the vote of a majority of the
 board members of the credit union, even if the dissolution is approved by less than a majority of all members of the credit union, if the commissioner finds, upon the written and verified application filed by the board of directors, that (1) notice of the meeting called to consider the dissolution or the written ballot for written vote on the dissolution was mailed to each member entitled to vote upon the question, (2) the notice or the written ballot disclosed the purpose of the meeting or the written vote and informed the membership that approval of the dissolution might be sought pursuant to this section, and (3) a majority of the votes cast upon the question were in favor of the dissolution.

(c) Whenever the members of the board of directors vote to recommend the dissolution of any credit union, the credit union shall not make any loans, withdrawal of shares, or withdrawal of certificates for funds until the members approve or disapprove
 the recommendation of the board of directors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 539, Sec. 43.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15251.

If the dissolution of the credit union is approved pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 15250, the board of directors of the credit union shall elect a committee of three members or may by resolution appoint a liquidating agent to liquidate the assets of the credit union. If the commissioner is appointed liquidating agent, the commissioner may act as liquidating agent or appoint the National Credit Union Administration or other person to act as liquidating agent. Whenever the commissioner is appointed liquidating agent, the credit union shall
 surrender its certificate to act as a credit union.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 539, Sec. 44.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15252.

Promptly thereafter the president or vice president and secretary or assistant secretary, or a majority of the committee or the liquidating agent in charge of liquidation, shall sign and verify a certificate stating that the credit union has elected to wind up and dissolve and showing by what vote or consent such election was made. The certificate shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State, and copies of the certificate certified by the Secretary of State shall be filed with the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 862, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

15253.

After a vote to dissolve a credit union no business may be carried on by the credit union except in the proper course of liquidation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

15254.

The committee or the liquidating agent in charge of liquidation may sue in the name and on behalf of the credit union, and may sell or otherwise dispose of the assets of the credit union, in whole or in part, at public or private sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

15255.

After determining that all known debts and liabilities of the credit union have been paid or adequately provided for, the committee or the liquidating agent in charge of liquidation shall distribute all the remaining assets of the credit union among the members or shareholders. Each share is entitled to its proportionate amount of the assets according to the amount paid on that share.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

15257.

When a credit union has completely wound up, all of its known debts and liabilities actually paid or adequately provided for or paid as far as its assets permit, and its known assets distributed, a majority of the committee or the liquidating agent in charge of liquidation shall sign and acknowledge a certificate stating that the credit union has been completely wound up, its known assets distributed, any tax or penalty due under the Bank and Corporation Franchise Tax Law paid, and its other known debts and liabilities actually paid or adequately provided for or paid as far as its assets permit and that the credit union is dissolved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

15258.

The certificate of dissolution shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State and copies, certified by him, shall be filed in the office of the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

15259.

At any time during the liquidation process, the committee or the liquidating agent in charge of liquidation may be relieved of their duties at the discretion of the commissioner and the commissioner shall thereafter act as the liquidating agent or appoint a liquidating agent to complete the dissolution of the credit union.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

15260.

Where the commissioner finds that on the date of filing with the Secretary of State of the certificate of election to wind up and dissolve, the credit union does not have sufficient assets to return to its shareholders their investment in full, the credit union shall not be liable for the costs of administration assessed under Article 4 (commencing with Section 14350) of Chapter 3.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Conversion Into Federal Credit Unions [15300. - 15306.]

15300.

A credit union may convert itself into a federal credit union by following the procedure contained in this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

15301.

Upon recommendation of the board of directors the members of any credit union may by an affirmative majority vote of such members resolve to convert such credit union into a federal credit union. For the purposes of this article, an “affirmative majority vote of such members” means that the vote by the members to convert the credit union into a federal credit union is approved or ratified by the affirmative vote of a majority of the votes represented and voting at a duly held meeting at which a quorum is present (which affirmative votes also constitute a
 majority of the required quorum) or written ballot in conformity with Section 7513 of the Corporations Code or by the affirmative vote or written ballot as may be provided in the bylaws pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 7151 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 399, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

15302.

Within 10 days after the meeting or written vote at which the members determine to convert into a federal credit union, the credit union shall file with the commissioner a certificate verified by the board of directors of such credit union. The certificate shall contain a copy of the minutes of the meeting or a copy of the written ballot and the results of the written vote and a statement that the members have approved the determination to convert such credit union into a federal credit union. A copy of such certificate shall be filed with the Secretary of State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 413, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

15303.

A certified copy of the certificate required by Section 15302 filed in the office of the Secretary of State is presumptive evidence of the holding of the meeting or written vote and the action taken thereat.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 413, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

15304.

After the meeting or the written vote of the members, the credit union shall take such action as is necessary to make it a federal credit union, and within 10 days after receipt of the federal charter, the credit union shall file with the commissioner and with the Secretary of State, a copy of the charter issued to such credit union by the National Credit Union Administration or a certificate showing the organization of such credit union as a federal credit union certified by or on behalf of the National Credit Union Administration. Upon the filing of such instrument with the Secretary of State the credit union ceases to be a state credit union and is a
 federal credit union.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 413, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

15305.

At the time the conversion into a federal credit union becomes effective, the credit union ceases to be supervised by this state and all of the property of the credit union, including all of its right, title, and interest in and to all property of every kind and character immediately, by operation of law and without any conveyance, or transfer and without any further act or deed, is vested in the credit union under its new name and style as a federal credit union and under its new jurisdiction.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

15306.

The converted federal credit union shall have, hold, and enjoy the property mentioned in Section 15305 in its own right as fully and to the same extent as the property was possessed, held, and enjoyed by it as a state credit union and the federal credit union shall continue responsible for all of the obligations of the state credit union to the same extent as though the conversion had not taken place. The federal credit union shall be merely a continuation of the state credit union under a new name and new jurisdiction and such revision of its corporate structure as is considered necessary for its proper operation under the new jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Conversion of Federal Credit Union [15350. - 15359.]

15350.

Upon recommendation of its board of directors, any federal credit union may convert into a credit union under the laws of this state by complying with the requirements of the Federal Credit Union Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1771) and on obtaining a certificate pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 14100) of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 765, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

15351.

The officers and directors of the federal credit union shall be the officers and directors of the credit union after conversion takes effect, to hold office until their successors are elected and qualified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

15352.

The commissioner may conduct a joint audit of the federal credit union with federal auditors. Upon completion of such audit, he shall issue a certificate to the National Credit Union Administration showing the results of such audit. The commissioner may also certify that the transfer of the assets and liabilities from the federal credit union to a credit union subject to the laws of this state has been effected in compliance with the applicable laws of this state. The costs of the audit mentioned in this section shall constitute a charge against the credit union.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

15353.

Copies of the minutes of the proceedings of the meeting of the members or the written ballot and the record of written vote of the members in which they voted to convert into a state credit union, verified by the board of directors of the credit union, shall be filed within 10 days after the meeting or written vote with the commissioner, and, in duplicate, with the National Credit Union Administration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 413, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

15354.

The verified copies of the minutes of the meeting or the record of written vote, when filed as required by Section 15353, are presumptive evidence of the holding of, and the action taken at, the meeting or the written vote.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 413, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

15355.

After an affirmative vote as provided in Section 15350, the federal credit union shall take or cause to be taken such action in the manner prescribed and authorized by this division as shall make it a credit union of this state. The directors shall file the documents and take such proceedings as are required by this division in the case of the original incorporation of a credit union.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 811.)
-------------------------------------------

15356.

The directors of a credit union converted from a federal credit union may insert in the articles of incorporation the following statement: “This credit union is incorporated by conversion from a federal credit union.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

15357.

Within 10 days after the filing of the articles of incorporation with the Secretary of State, there shall be filed, with the National Credit Union Administration, two copies of the articles of incorporation, certified by the Secretary of State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

15358.

Upon the filing of the articles of incorporation with the Secretary of State and the issuance of a certificate by the commissioner authorizing the federal credit union to act as a credit union under the laws of this state, the credit union ceases to be a federal credit union and is a credit union under the laws of this state. All of the property of the credit union immediately, by operation of law and without any further act, is vested in the credit union under its new name and existence as a credit union under the laws of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 765, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

15359.

The converted credit union shall have, hold, and enjoy the property mentioned in Section 15358 in its own right as fully and to the same extent as the property was possessed, held, and enjoyed by it as a federal credit union and the converted credit union continues responsible for all of the obligations of the federal credit union to the same extent as though conversion had not taken place. The converted credit union is merely a continuation of the federal credit union under a new name and new jurisdiction and such revision of its corporate structure as is considered necessary for its proper operation under the new jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10. Central Credit Union [15400. - 15451.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definition [15400. - 15400.]

15400.

“Central credit union” means a credit union whose membership includes, but is not limited to, other credit unions, members of credit unions, credit union employees, employees of organizations serving credit unions, and the families of such members and any common bond set out in subdivision (a) of Section 14155.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 452, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General [15450. - 15451.]

15450.

Central credit unions may be organized and operated under this division. Each such credit union shall use the word “central” in its official name.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

15451.

(a) A central credit union may, with the approval of the commissioner and under such regulations as he shall prescribe, admit to membership groups of employees of a common employer, including the employer, whose place of employment is located within 25 miles of the principal office of the central credit union, or is located within the boundaries of a greater or lesser geographic area prescribed by the commissioner, upon application made by the employer and approval of the board of directors of the central credit union.

(b) In the event the employee group qualifies
 under the provisions of Section 14154, these employees may organize a separate credit union. The central credit union may, upon a plan approved by the commissioner, transfer the member accounts of these employees to any credit union formed by them.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 691, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 11. Foreign (Other State) Credit Unions [16000. - 16206.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [16000. - 16013.]

16000.

This chapter may be cited as the “Foreign (Other State) Credit Union Law.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 612, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

16001.

In this chapter:

(a) “Branch business” means the business of issuing share accounts, certificates for funds, and share drafts, receiving deposits, paying checks, making loans and other obligations, and other activities that the commissioner may specify by order or regulation.

(b) “California branch office,” when used with respect to a foreign (other state) credit union, means an office in this state at which the foreign (other state)
 credit union engages in branch business.

(c) (1) “California facility,” when used with respect to a foreign (other state) credit union, means an office in this state at which the foreign (other state) credit union engages in business other than branch business.

(2) In the case of an employer-supported foreign (other state) credit union, a “California facility” does not include a table, counter, or booth on the premises of the employer’s place of business at which a volunteer of the foreign (other state) credit union provides information or services to members but does not engage in branch business.

(d) “Foreign nation” means any nation other than the United States, including, without limitation, any subdivision, territory, trust territory, dependency, colony, or possession of any nation other
 than the United States.

(e) “Foreign (other nation) credit union” means any credit union or similar institution that is organized under the laws of a foreign nation.

(f) “Foreign (other state) credit union” means a credit union that is organized under the laws of any state of the United States other than this state.

(g) “Home state,” when used with respect to a foreign (other state) credit union, means the state of the United States under which the foreign (other state) credit union is organized.

(h) “Home state regulator,” when used with respect to a foreign (other state) credit union, means the state regulatory agency in the home state of the foreign (other state) credit union which has primary regulatory authority over the foreign (other state)
 credit union.

(i) “State of the United States” means any state of the United States, the District of Columbia, any territory of the United States, Puerto Rico, Guam, American Samoa, the Trust Territory of the Pacific Islands, the Virgin Islands, and the Northern Mariana Islands.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 612, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

16002.

Nothing in this chapter shall be deemed to authorize a foreign (other nation) credit union to transact business in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 612, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

16003.

No foreign (other state) credit union may establish or maintain a California branch office or California facility unless it is qualified to transact intrastate business under Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 2100) of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code, except as provided in Section 8910 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 612, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

16004.

No foreign (other state) credit union may establish a California branch office or California facility unless its deposit or share accounts are insured by the National Credit Union Administration or other insurer that is not unsatisfactory to the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 612, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

16005.

Each application filed with the commissioner under this chapter or under any regulation or order issued under this chapter shall be in the form, shall contain the information, shall be signed in the manner, and shall (if the commissioner requires by regulation or order) be verified in the manner that the commissioner may by regulation or order require.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 612, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

16006.

Fees shall be paid to and collected by the commissioner as follows:

(a) The fee for an application by a foreign (other state) credit union that is not licensed to transact business in this state for approval to establish a branch office is one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(b) The fee for an application by a foreign (other state) credit union that is licensed to transact business in this state for approval to establish a California branch office is five hundred dollars ($500).

(c) The fee for issuing a license to establish and maintain a California branch office or California facility is twenty-five dollars ($25).

(d) Each foreign (other state) credit union that on June 1 of any year maintains one or more California branch offices or California facilities shall pay, on or before the following July 1, a fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per California branch office and one hundred dollars ($100) per California facility. However, the maximum fee shall be not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).
